Hawaii statutes.
§460J-12 Classification of branches of pest
control; examinations; rules; subjects of examination; passing grade. (a)
Licenses issued to operators or field representatives shall be limited to the
branch or branches of pest control for which the applicant has qualified by
application and examination. For the purpose of delimiting the type and
character of work authorized by the various branch licenses hereinafter set
forth, the practice of pest control is classified into the following branches:

(1) Branch 1. Fumigation. The practice relating to
the control of household and wood-destroying pests by fumigation with poisonous
or lethal gases.

(2) Branch 2. General Pest. The practice relating
to the control of household pests, other than termites, excluding fumigation
with poisonous or lethal gases.

(3) Branch 3. Termite. The practice relating to the
control of wood-destroying pests by the use of insecticides and corrections,
excluding fumigation with poisonous or lethal gases.

The board may issue a license for a combination
of two or more branches for which an applicant qualifies under this chapter,
and such combination license shall be considered one license for the purpose of
determining the fee to be charged under section 460J-14.

(b) Unless otherwise authorized by the board,
all written examinations shall be in ink in books supplied by the board. All
examination papers shall be kept for a period of one year, upon the expiration
of which such papers may be destroyed on order of the board. Each applicant
for license shall be designated by a number instead of by name and the identity
thereof shall not be disclosed until the examination papers are graded. No
person shall be admitted to the examination room except the examining personnel
and the applicants for license.

(c) The board shall make rules for the purpose
of securing fair, impartial, and proper examinations.

(d) Licensees of any branch may be licensed in
other branches upon complying with the requirements for qualification and by
examination in such other branches. No failure of the licensee to pass
examination in such other branches shall have any effect on existing licenses.

(e) The examinations shall be in each of the
subjects specified in the branch or branches relating to the respective
applications. A license according to such applications shall be granted to any
applicant who scores a passing grade on the examination in each of the subjects
of such branch or branches. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c
74, §4; am L 1997, c 84, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next